Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/et_EE.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aeistlunkodmrvpgjhäõbüoöfcwzxšqž
COMPOUNDFLAG Z
COMPOUNDMIN 2
# rule/flag 1 (affects 97897 words, has 52 subrules):
SFX a Y 52
SFX a 0 b u
SFX a 0 bki u
SFX a 0 dki u
SFX a 0 gi [aelmnr]
SFX a 0 ki [dst]
SFX a 0 ksid u
SFX a 0 ksidki u
SFX a 0 ksime u
SFX a 0 ksimegi u
SFX a 0 ksin u
SFX a 0 ksingi u
SFX a 0 ksite u
SFX a 0 ksitegi u
SFX a 0 kski u
SFX a 0 ku k
SFX a 0 kugi k
SFX a 0 kusid k
SFX a 0 kusidki k
SFX a 0 me u
SFX a 0 megi u
SFX a 0 n u
SFX a 0 ngi u
SFX a 0 ta i
SFX a 0 tagi i
SFX a 0 tagu i
SFX a 0 tagugi i
SFX a 0 taks i
SFX a 0 takse i
SFX a 0 taksegi i
SFX a 0 takski i
SFX a 0 tama i
SFX a 0 tamagi i
SFX a 0 tav i
SFX a 0 tavgi i
SFX a 0 tavus i
SFX a 0 tavuski i
SFX a 0 tavusse i
SFX a 0 tavussegi i
SFX a 0 tavust i
SFX a 0 tavustki i
SFX a 0 te u
SFX a 0 tegi u
SFX a 0 ti i
SFX a 0 tigi i
SFX a 0 us v
SFX a 0 uski v
SFX a 0 usse v
SFX a 0 ussegi v
SFX a 0 ust v
SFX a 0 ustki v
SFX a 0 vad u
SFX a 0 vadki u
